Mississippi, session 2026, HB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Recognizing Judea and Samaria Act." SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature to refer to the land controlled by Israel from Jordan during the Six-Day War by its historical name of "Judea and Samaria", with the land south of Jerusalem being considered "Judea" and the land north of Jerusalem being considered "Samaria"; and No longer use the term "West Bank" in official government materials. SECTION 3.  The following words and phrases have the meanings as provided in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Official government material" means a guidance, rule, material, briefing, press release, or communication prepared by a state agency; and (b)  "State agency" means every department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state. SECTION 4. (a)  Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a state agency shall not use the term "West Bank" to refer to Judea and Samaria in an official government material. A state agency shall not use state monies to create an official government material that refers to Judea and Samaria as "West Bank". (b)  The executive head of a state agency may waive the prohibition under subsection (a) of this section if the executive head determines that it is in the interests of the state to do so, and submits a written explanation of the waiver no later than thirty (30) days after the date on which the executive head of the state agency makes a determination under this section to the: (i)  Legislature, if the Legislature is in session; or (ii)  Governor, if the Legislature is not in session. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.